Utah statutes.
53B-21-109.   Student building fees.
(1)  The board issuing bonds under this chapter may impose and collect student
building fees from all students in attendance at the institution in behalf of
which the bonds are issued.
(2)  The board may also pledge the fees in the same manner provided for the
pledging of other revenues of the board or institution under this chapter.
